Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 34 Health Maintenance Organizations

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coverage under medical and health insurance plans for services performed by dentists, oral surgeons, and orthondontists, 43 ALR5th 657.

Liability of health maintenance organizations (HMOs) for negligence of member physicians, 51 ALR5th 271.

Qualification of health care entities for federal tax exemption as charitable organization under 26 USC § 501(c)(3), 134 ALR Fed 395.

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2003, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, requests Congress to equalize the tax treatment of employer-provided and individually purchased health insurance by creating a tax credit for the full amount of insurance purchased by individuals since the high cost of health insurance has created a large number of uninsured citizens in the United States and the State, those without health insurance are less likely to receive adequate health care, insurance purchasing decisions are to a large extent made by employers and not insurance beneficiaries, overreliance on employer-provided health insurance impedes worker mobility, spiraling health care costs are in part caused by a lack of active consumer participation in health care markets, and employers can deduct the full cost of employee health insurance as a business expense, while individuals may not.

§ 26-34-101.
Short title.

This chapter is known and may be cited as “The Health Maintenance Organization Act of 1995”.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to Risk-Based Capital for Health Organizations, see §§

26-48-201

et seq.

§ 26-34-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrator” means the director of the department of health;

“Basic health care services” means emergency care, inpatient hospital and physician care, and outpatient medical services, but does not include mental health services or services for alcohol or drug abuse;

“Capitated basis” means fixed per member per month payment or percentage of premium payment wherein the provider assumes the full risk for the cost of contracted services without regard to the type, value or frequency of services provided. For purposes of this definition, “capitated basis” includes the cost associated with operating staff model facilities;

“Carrier” means a health maintenance organization, an insurer, a hospital and medical service corporation or other entity responsible for the payment of benefits or the provision of services under a group contract;

“Commissioner” means the insurance commissioner of this state;

“Coinsurance” means a percentage of eligible charges payable by an enrollee directly to a provider for covered services rendered;

“Copayment” means an amount an enrollee must pay in order to receive a specific service which is not fully prepaid;

“Deductible” means the amount an enrollee is responsible to pay out-of-pocket before the health maintenance organization begins to pay the costs associated with treatment;

“Discontinuance” means the termination of the contract between the group contract holder and a health maintenance organization due to the insolvency of the health maintenance organization, and does not refer to the termination of any agreement between any individual enrollee and the health maintenance organization;

“Enrollee” means an individual who is enrolled in a health maintenance organization;

“Evidence of coverage” means any certificate, agreement or contract issued to an enrollee setting out the coverage to which the enrollee is entitled;

“Extension of benefits” means the continuation of coverage under a particular benefit provided under a contract following termination with respect to an enrollee who is totally disabled on the date of termination;

“Group contract” means a contract for health care services which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a specified group. The group contract may include coverage for dependents;

“Group contract holder” means the person to which a group contract has been issued;

“Health care services” means any services included in the furnishing to any individual of medical or dental care, vision care or hospitalization or incident to the furnishing of that care or hospitalization, as well as the furnishing to any person of any other services for the purpose of preventing, alleviating, curing or healing human illness, injury or physical disability;

“Health maintenance organization” means any person, except a person offering a dental only or vision only plan, who undertakes to provide or arrange for basic health care services to enrollees on a prepaid basis, except for enrollee responsibility for copayments, coinsurance or deductibles, and may include providing or arranging for:

Physician services directly through physician employees or under arrangements with individual physicians or groups of physicians;

Other health care services on a prepayment or other financial basis.

“Health maintenance organization producer” means a person who solicits, negotiates, effects, procures, delivers, renews or continues a policy or contract for health maintenance organization membership, or who takes or transmits a membership fee or premium for such a policy or contract, other than for himself, or a person who advertises or otherwise holds himself out to the public as undertaking any of the activities of a health maintenance organization producer;

“Individual contract” means a contract for health care services issued to and covering an individual. The individual contract may include dependents of the subscriber;

“Insolvent” or “insolvency” means that the organization has been declared insolvent and placed under an order of liquidation by a court of competent jurisdiction;

“Managed hospital payment basis” means agreements under which the financial risk is primarily related to the degree of utilization rather than to the cost of services;

“Net worth” means the excess of total admitted assets over total liabilities, but the liabilities shall not include fully subordinated debt;

“Participating provider” means a provider as defined in paragraph (xxiv) of this subsection who, under an express or implied contract with the health maintenance organization or with its contractor or subcontractor, has agreed to provide health care services to enrollees with an expectation of receiving payment, other than copayment, coinsurance or deductible, directly or indirectly from the health maintenance organization;

“Person” means as defined by W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xx);

“Provider” means any physician, hospital or other person which is licensed or otherwise authorized to furnish health care services in the state in which the services are rendered;

“Replacement coverage” means the benefits provided by a succeeding carrier;

“Subscriber” means an individual whose employment or other status, except family dependency, is the basis for eligibility for enrollment in the health maintenance organization, or in the case of an individual contract, the person in whose name the contract is issued;

“Uncovered expenditures” means the costs to the health maintenance organization for health care services that are the obligation of the health maintenance organization, for which an enrollee may also be liable in the event of the health maintenance organization’s insolvency and for which no alternative arrangements have been made that are acceptable to the commissioner;

“This code” means title 26 of the Wyoming statutes;

“This act” means W.S.

26-34-101

through

26-34-134

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1995, ch. 210, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(xxix), substituted “26-34-134” for “26-34-133.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 26-34-103.
Establishment of health maintenance organizations.

Notwithstanding any law of this state to the contrary, any person may apply to the commissioner for a certificate of authority to establish and operate a health maintenance organization in compliance with this chapter. No person shall establish or operate a health maintenance organization in this state, without obtaining a certificate of authority under this chapter.

Any health maintenance organization in operation as of July 1, 1995, shall submit an application for a certificate of authority under this section not later than August 1, 1995. Each applicant may continue to operate until the commissioner acts upon the application. If an application is denied under W.S.

26-34-104

, the applicant shall be treated as a health maintenance organization whose certificate of authority has been revoked.

Each application for a certificate of authority shall be verified by an officer or authorized representative of the applicant, shall be in a form the commissioner prescribes and shall set forth or be accompanied by the following:

A copy of the applicant’s organizational documents, such as the articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership agreement, trust agreement or other applicable documents, and all amendments thereto;

A copy of the bylaws, rules and regulations or similar document, if any, regulating the conduct of the applicant’s internal affairs;

A list of the names, addresses, biographical information and official positions of the persons who are to be responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s affairs, including all members of the board of directors, board of trustees, executive committee or other governing board or committee, the principal officers in the case of a corporation, and the partners or members in the case of a partnership or association;

A copy of any contract made or to be made between any providers, third party administrators, marketing consultants or persons listed in paragraph (iii) of this subsection and the health maintenance organization;

A copy of the form of evidence of coverage to be issued to the enrollees;

A copy of the form or group contract, if any, which is to be issued to employers, unions, trustees or other organizations;

Financial statements prepared in conformity with the requirements of this code showing the applicant’s assets, liabilities and sources of financial support. A copy of the applicant’s most recent certified financial statement and an unaudited current financial statement shall be included;

A financial feasibility plan which includes detailed enrollment projections, the methodology for determining premium rates to be charged during the first twelve (12) months of operations certified by an actuary or other qualified person, a projection of balance sheets, cash flow statements showing any capital expenditures, purchase and sale of investments and deposits with the state and income and expense statements anticipated from the start of operations until the organization has had net income for at least one (1) year and a statement as to the sources of working capital as well as any other sources of funding;

A power of attorney executed by the applicant, if not domiciled in this state, appointing the commissioner and his successors in office, and authorized deputies, as the true and lawful attorney of the applicant in and for this state upon whom all lawful process in any legal action or proceeding against the health maintenance organization on a cause of action arising in this state may be served;

A statement reasonably describing the geographic area or areas to be served;

A description of the complaint procedures to be used as required under W.S.

26-34-112

;

A description of the procedures and programs to be implemented to meet the quality of health care requirements in W.S.

26-34-104

(b);

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 5.

A description of the procedures to be implemented to meet the protection against insolvency requirements in W.S.

26-34-114

;

A list of the names, addresses and professional license numbers of all providers with which the health maintenance organization has agreements;

A description of the quality assurance program and the mechanisms in place to assure availability, accessibility and continuity of care required under W.S.

26-34-108

;

Any other information the commissioner requires to make the determinations specified in W.S.

26-34-104

.

Any applicant or health maintenance organization holding a certificate of authority granted under this chapter, unless otherwise provided for in this chapter, shall file a notice describing any material modification of the operation set out in the information required by subsection (c) of this section. The notice shall be filed with the commissioner prior to the modification. If the commissioner does not disapprove within forty-five (45) days of filing, the modification is deemed approved.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations exempting from the filing requirements of subsection (a) of this section those items he deems unnecessary.

Any applicant or health maintenance organization holding a certificate of authority granted under this chapter shall file all contracts of reinsurance with the commissioner. Any agreement between the organization and an insurer is subject to the requirements of this code regarding reinsurance. All reinsurance agreements and any modifications thereto shall be filed and approved before the effective date of any agreement or modification. Reinsurance agreements shall remain in full force and effect for at least ninety (90) days following written notice to the commissioner, by registered mail, of cancellation by either party.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, §§ 2, 5.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-34-102(a)(xxviii).

§ 26-34-104.
Issuance of certificate of authority.

Upon receipt of an application for issuance of a certificate of authority, the commissioner shall immediately transmit a copy of the application and accompanying documents to the administrator.

The administrator shall determine whether the applicant for a certificate of authority, with respect to health care services to be furnished has complied with W.S.

26-34-108

.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 5.

Within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the application for issuance of a certificate of authority, the administrator shall certify to the commissioner that the proposed health maintenance organization meets the requirements of W.S.

26-34-108

or notify the commissioner that the health maintenance organization does not meet the requirements and specify in what respects it is deficient.

The commissioner shall issue or deny a certificate of authority to any person filing an application pursuant to W.S.

26-34-103

within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the certification from the administrator. Issuance of a certificate of authority shall be granted upon payment of the application fee prescribed in W.S.

26-34-126

if the commissioner is satisfied that the following conditions are met:

The persons responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s affairs are competent and trustworthy;

The administrator certifies that the health maintenance organization’s proposed plan of operation meets the requirements of W.S.

26-34-108

;

The health maintenance organization shall effectively provide or arrange for the provision of basic health care services on a prepaid basis, through insurance or otherwise, except to the extent of reasonable requirements for copayments, coinsurance and deductibles;

The health maintenance organization is financially responsible and may reasonably be expected to meet its obligations to enrollees and prospective enrollees. In making this determination, the commissioner may consider:

The financial soundness of the arrangements for health care services and the schedule of premiums used in connection therewith;

The adequacy of working capital;

Any agreement with an insurer, a hospital or medical service corporation, a government or any other organization or entity for insuring the payment of the cost of health care services or the provision for automatic applicability of an alternative coverage in the event of discontinuance of the health maintenance organization;

Any agreement with providers for the provision of health care services; and

Any deposit of cash or securities submitted in accordance with W.S.

26-34-114

.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 5.

Nothing in the proposed method of operation, as shown by the information submitted pursuant to W.S.

26-34-103

or by independent investigation, is contrary to the public interest; and

Any deficiencies identified by the administrator have been corrected.

A certificate of authority shall be denied only after compliance with the requirements of W.S.

26-34-125

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, §§ 2, 5.

§ 26-34-105.
Powers of health maintenance organizations.

The powers of a health maintenance organization include but are not limited to the:

Purchase, lease, construction, renovation, operation or maintenance of hospitals or medical facilities, or both, and their ancillary equipment, and any property as may reasonably be required for its principal office or for any purposes as may be necessary in the transaction of the business of the organization;

Making of loans to a medical group under contract with it in furtherance of its program or the making of loans to a corporation or corporations under its control for the purpose of acquiring or constructing medical facilities and hospitals or in furtherance of a program providing health care services to enrollees;

Furnishing of health care services through providers which are under contract with or employed by the health maintenance organization;

Contracting with any person for the performance on its behalf of certain functions such as marketing, enrollment and administration;

Contracting with an insurance company licensed in this state, or with a hospital or health service corporation authorized to do business in this state, for the provision of insurance, indemnity or reimbursement against the cost of health care services provided by the health maintenance organization;

Offering of other health care services, in addition to basic health care services. Nonbasic health care services may be offered by a health maintenance organization on a prepaid basis without offering basic health care services to any group or individual;

The joint marketing of products with an insurance company licensed in this state or with a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to do business in this state as long as the company that is offering each product is clearly identified.

A health maintenance organization shall file notice, with adequate supporting information, with the commissioner prior to the exercise of any power granted in paragraph (a)(i), (ii) or (iv) of this section. The commissioner shall disapprove any exercise of power only if in his opinion it would substantially and adversely affect the financial soundness of the health maintenance organization and endanger its ability to meet its obligations. If the commissioner does not disapprove within forty-five (45) days from the date of the filing, it is deemed approved.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations exempting from the filing requirement of subsection (b) of this section those activities having a de minimis effect.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 26-34-106.
Governing body.

The governing body of any health maintenance organization may include providers, or other individuals, or both.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 5.

Any domestic health maintenance organization shall comply with the requirements applicable to a domestic insurer in W.S.

26-24-129

and shall be subject to the penalties provided in W.S.

26-24-129

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 5; 2016 ch. 24, § 2, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, added (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 24 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

§ 26-34-107.
Fiduciary responsibilities.

Any director, officer, employee or partner of a health maintenance organization who receives, handles, collects, disburses or invests funds in connection with the activities of the organization is responsible for those funds in a fiduciary relationship to the organization and shall not violate the prohibitions specified in W.S.

26-24-127

.

A health maintenance organization shall maintain in force a fidelity bond on employees and officers in an amount not less than the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00), ten percent (10%) of the organization’s previous year’s gross premiums or other amount the commissioner prescribes. All such bonds shall be written with at least a one (1) year discovery period and if written with less than a three (3) year discovery period shall contain a provision that no cancellation or termination of the bond, whether by or at the request of the insured or by the underwriter is effective prior to the expiration of ninety (90) days after written notice of the cancellation or termination has been filed with the commissioner unless the commissioner approves an earlier date of cancellation or termination.

A health maintenance organization shall not make any disbursement of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or more without complying with the requirements specified for insurers in W.S.

26-24-130

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 2; 2016 ch. 24, § 2, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, in (a), added “handles,” following “who receives,” and added “and shall not violate the prohibitions specified in W.S.

26-24-127

.” at the end; and added (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 24 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

§ 26-34-108.
Quality assurance program.

The health maintenance organization shall establish procedures to assure that the health care services provided to enrollees are rendered under reasonable standards of quality of care consistent with prevailing professionally recognized standards of medical practice. The procedures shall include mechanisms to assure availability, accessibility and continuity of care.

The health maintenance organization shall have an ongoing internal quality assurance program to monitor and evaluate its health care services, including primary and specialist physician services, and ancillary and preventive health care services, across all institutional and noninstitutional settings. The program shall include, at a minimum, the following:

A written statement of goals and objectives which emphasizes improved health status in evaluating the quality of care rendered to enrollees;

A written quality assurance plan which describes the following:

The health maintenance organization’s scope and purpose in quality assurance;

The organizational structure responsible for quality assurance activities;

Contractual arrangements, where appropriate, for delegation of quality assurance activities;

Confidentiality policies and procedures;

A system of ongoing evaluation activities;

A system of focused evaluation activities;

A system for credentialing providers and performing peer review activities; and

Duties and responsibilities of the designated physician responsible for the quality assurance activities.

A written statement describing the system of ongoing quality assurance activities including:

Problem assessment, identification, selection and study;

Corrective action, monitoring, evaluation and reassessment; and

Interpretation and analysis of patterns of care rendered to individual patients by individual providers.

A written statement describing the system of focused quality assurance activities based on representative samples of the enrolled population which identifies method of topic selection, study, data collection, analysis, interpretation and report format; and

Written plans for taking appropriate corrective action whenever, as determined by the quality assurance program, inappropriate or substandard care or services have been provided, or care or services which should have been furnished have not been provided.

The organization shall record proceedings of formal quality assurance program activities and maintain documentation in a confidential manner. Quality assurance program minutes shall be available to the administrator. Contents of the minutes shall be confidential to the extent confidentiality is provided under the provisions of W.S. 16-4-203(d)(i) and (vii),

26-34-129

,

26-34-130

,

35-2-910

or

35-17-105

.

The organization shall ensure the use and maintenance of an adequate patient record system which will facilitate documentation and retrieval of clinical information for the purpose of the health maintenance organization evaluating continuity and coordination of patient care and assessing the quality of health and medical care provided to enrollees.

Enrollee clinical records shall be available to the administrator or an authorized designee for examination and review to ascertain compliance with this section, or as deemed necessary by the administrator.

The organization shall establish a mechanism for periodic reporting of quality assurance program activities to the governing body, providers and appropriate organization staff.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 1; 2019 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), deleted "35-2-605 through

35-2-617

."

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-108

, relating to evidence of coverage and charges for health care services, was renumbered as

26-34-109

by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3.

§ 26-34-109.
Requirements for group contract, individual contract, evidence of coverage and premiums for health care services.

Every group and individual contract holder is entitled to a group or individual contract. The contract shall not contain provisions or statements which are unjust, unfair, inequitable, misleading, deceptive, or which encourage misrepresentation as defined by W.S. 26-34-117(a). The contract shall contain a clear statement of the following:

Name and address of the health maintenance organization;

Eligibility requirements;

Benefits and services within the service area;

Emergency care benefits and services;

Out of area benefits and services, if any;

Copayments, coinsurance, deductibles or other out-of-pocket expenses;

Limitations and exclusions, including an explanation of any prescription drug benefits not provided for under a specified health plan;

Enrollee termination;

Enrollee reinstatement, if any;

Claims procedures;

Enrollee complaint procedures;

Continuation of coverage;

Conversion;

Extension of benefits, if any;

Coordination of benefits, if applicable;

Subrogation, if any;

Description of the service area;

Entire contract provision;

Term of coverage;

Cancellation of group or individual contract holder;

Renewal;

Reinstatement of group or individual contract holder, if any;

Grace period as provided in W.S.

26-18-107

;

Conformity with state law; and

Any withholding agreement pertaining to health care delivery services which requires reimbursement to the provider at a later date dependent upon decisions regarding coverage. The agreement shall specify the requirements in detail. If the existence of a withholding agreement has been disclosed in the contract, the health maintenance organization may alter the terms of the agreement without being deemed to alter the terms of the contract provided the contract holder is notified in detail of the new terms of the agreement at his next renewal.

In addition to those provisions required in subsection (a) of this section, an individual contract shall provide for a ten (10) day period to examine and return the contract and have the premium refunded. If services were received during the ten (10) day period, and the person returns the contract to receive a refund of the premium paid, he shall pay for the services.

Each enrollee residing in this state shall receive an evidence of coverage from the group contract holder or the health maintenance organization. The evidence of coverage shall not contain provisions or statements which are unfair, unjust, inequitable, misleading, deceptive or which encourage misrepresentation as defined by W.S. 26-34-117(a). The evidence of coverage shall contain:

A clear statement of the provisions required in paragraphs (a)(i) through (xvii) of this section; and

A provision that any subsequent material change shall be evidenced in a separate document issued to the enrollee.

No group or individual contract, evidence of coverage, or amendment thereto, shall be issued or delivered to any person in this state:

Until a copy of the form of the contract, evidence of coverage, or amendment thereto, has been filed with and approved by the commissioner.

Every form required by this section shall be filed with the commissioner not less than forty-five (45) days prior to delivery or issue for delivery in this state. At any time during the initial forty-five (45) day period, the commissioner may extend the period for review for an additional forty-five (45) days. Notice of an extension shall be in writing. At the end of the review period, the form is deemed approved if the commissioner has taken no action. The filer shall notify the commissioner in writing prior to using a form that is deemed approved.

At any time, after thirty (30) days notice and for cause shown, the commissioner may withdraw approval of any form, effective at the end of thirty (30) days.

When a filing is disapproved or approval of a form is withdrawn, the commissioner shall give the health maintenance organization written notice of the reasons for disapproval and in the notice shall inform the health maintenance organization that within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice the health maintenance organization may request a hearing. A hearing shall be conducted within thirty (30) days after the commissioner has received the request for hearing.

The commissioner may adopt regulations establishing readability standards for individual contract, group contract, and evidence of coverage forms.

No schedule of premiums or methodology for determining a schedule of premiums for enrollee coverage for health care services, or amendment thereto, may be used until a copy of that schedule, or amendment thereto, has been filed with and approved by the commissioner.

Premiums or methodology for determining a schedule of premiums shall be established in accordance with actuarial principles for various categories of enrollees, provided that premiums applicable to an enrollee may not be individually determined based on the status of his health. However, the premiums shall not be excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory. A certification, by a qualified actuary or other qualified person acceptable to the commissioner, to the appropriateness of the use of the methodology, based on reasonable assumptions, shall accompany the filing along with adequate supporting information.

The commissioner, within a reasonable period, shall approve any form if the requirements of subsections (a) through (g) of this section are met and any schedule of premiums if the requirements of subsections (j) and (k) of this section are met. It is unlawful to issue a form or to use the schedule of premiums until approved or deemed approved.

The commissioner may require the submission of whatever relevant information he deems necessary in determining whether to approve or disapprove a filing made pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, §§ 3, 5; 2016 ch. 24, § 2, effective January 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning disability insurance policies, see ch. 18 of this title.

The 2016 amendment

, effective January 1, 2017, added “as provided in W.S.

26-18-107

” at the end of (a)(xxiii).

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-109

, relating to an annual report, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3 as §

26-34-110

.

There is no paragraph (d)(ii) or subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-34-110.
Annual report.

Each health maintenance organization, annually, on or before March 1, shall file with the commissioner, with a copy to the administrator, a report verified by at least two (2) organization principal officers and covering the immediately preceding calendar year. Each health maintenance organization shall file with the commissioner on a quarterly basis a statement of its financial condition for the preceding quarter. Each quarterly statement shall be filed with the commissioner on or before forty-five (45) days from the end of the quarter being reported. The reports and statements shall be on forms the commissioner prescribes and shall be completed pursuant to the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual.

The health maintenance organization shall file on or before March 1, unless otherwise stated:

Audited financial statements in accordance with the provisions of title 26, chapter 3, article 3 of the Wyoming statutes on or before June 1;

A list of the providers who have executed a contract that complies with W.S.

26-34-114

; and

The report on the complaint system pursuant to W.S. 26-34-112(b).

All annual and quarterly statements filed pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by an electronic version containing the same information as the statement. The commissioner may specify the format of the electronic version. The commissioner may accept, for any health maintenance organization not domiciled in this state which is required to file annual, quarterly and audited financial statements under this section, an electronic filing with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners meeting the requirements of this section as a filing with the commissioner. The commissioner may refuse to continue or may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any health maintenance organization failing to file its annual or quarterly statement when due.

The commissioner may require any additional reports as are deemed reasonably necessary and appropriate to enable him to carry out his duties under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2004, ch. 14, § 2; 2007, ch. 44, § 2; 2009, ch. 94, § 2; 2018 ch. 14, § 2, effective January 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), substituted “electronic version” for “computer diskette” twice, substituted “format” for “size and format,” and added the penultimate sentence.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “annual, quarterly and audited financial statements” for “any statement” in (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010,
substituted “26-3-317” for “26-3-314” in (b)(i).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in (b)(i), substituted “the provisions of title 26, chapter 3, article 3 of the Wyoming statutes on or before” for “the provisions of W.S.

26-3-301

through

26-3-317

on or before.”

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-110

, relating to information to enrollees, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3 as §

26-34-111

.

§ 26-34-111.
Information to enrollees; claims to be accepted or rejected; attorney’s fees.

Each health maintenance organization shall:

Provide promptly to its enrollees notice of any material change in the operation of the organization that will directly affect those enrollees;

Provide to its subscribers a list of providers, upon enrollment and reenrollment;

Notify an enrollee in writing of the termination of the primary care provider who provided health care services to that enrollee, and provide assistance to the enrollee in transferring to another participating primary care provider;

Provide to subscribers information on how services may be obtained, where additional information on access to services can be obtained and a telephone number where the enrollee can contact the organization at no cost to the enrollee.

Any claim for a benefit under a health insurance policy shall be rejected or accepted and paid by the health maintenance organization in accordance with W.S. 26-15-124(a) and (c).

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 3; 2016 ch. 24, § 2, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, added (b).

Laws 2016, ch. 24 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Former §

26-34-111

, relating to a complaint system, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 4 as §

26-34-112

.

§ 26-34-112.
Complaint system.

Each health maintenance organization shall establish and maintain a complaint system which has been approved by the commissioner, after consultation with the administrator, to provide reasonable procedures for the resolution of written complaints initiated by enrollees.

Each health maintenance organization shall submit to the commissioner and the administrator, an annual report, in a form the commissioner prescribes, after consultation with the administrator, which shall include:

A description of the procedures of the complaint system;

The total number of complaints handled through the complaint system and a compilation of causes underlying the complaints filed; and

The number, amount and disposition of malpractice claims made by an enrollee of the organization that were settled during the year by the health maintenance organization. All such information shall be held in confidence by the commissioner.

The commissioner or the administrator may examine the complaint system at any time.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-112

, relating to investments, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3, as §

26-34-113

.

§ 26-34-113.
Investments.

With the exception of investments made in accordance with W.S. 26-34-105(a)(i), the funds of a health maintenance organization shall be invested only in securities or other investments permitted by chapter 7 of this code.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, §§ 3, 5.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

26-34-113

, relating to protection against insolvency, was renumbered by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 3 as §

26-34-114

.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-34-102(a)(xxviii).